Utah statutes.
17-19a-101.   Title and scope.

(1)  This chapter is known as "County Auditor."

(2) (a)  This chapter applies to a county of the first class.

(b) (i)  On or before December 31, 2014, a county of the second, third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class is not subject to the provisions of this chapter; and

(ii)  on or after January 1, 2015, a county of the second, third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class is subject to the provisions of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 17, 2012 General Session

